Utah statutes.
17-2-103.   Consolidation of counties -- Petition -- Election -- Ballot.
(1)  If a majority of the legal voters of any county desire to have the county
joined to and consolidated with an adjoining county, they may petition the
county legislative body of the county in which they reside and the county
legislative body of the adjoining county.
(2)  Each petition under Subsection (1) shall be presented before the first
Monday in June of any year.
(3) (a)  If a petition under Subsection (1) is presented in a year during
which a regular general election is held, the county legislative body of the
originating county and the county legislative body of the consolidating county
shall cause the proposition to be submitted to the legal voters of their
respective counties at the next regular general election.
(b)  If a petition under Subsection (1) is presented during a year in which
there is no regular general election, the county legislative body of the
originating county and the county legislative body of the consolidating county
shall:
(i)  call a special election to be held on the first Tuesday after the first
Monday in November following the presentation of the petition; and
(ii)  cause the proposition to be submitted to the legal voters of the
respective counties on that day.
(c)  Except as otherwise provided in this part, an election under this
Subsection (3) shall be held, the results canvassed, and returns made under
the provisions of the general election laws of the state.
(d)  The ballot to be used at an election under this Subsection (3) shall be:
For combining ____ county with ____ county.
Against combining ____ county with ____ county.
